Texas statutes.
INSURANCE CODE

TITLE 10. PROPERTY AND CASUALTY INSURANCE

SUBTITLE G. POOLS, GROUPS, PLANS, AND SELF-INSURANCE

CHAPTER 2171. COMMERCIAL GROUP PROPERTY INSURANCE

Sec. 2171.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "large risk" means an insured described by Section 2301.004.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 2171.002. AUTHORIZATION FOR ISSUANCE. An insurer may write commercial group property insurance for:

(1) a group of businesses that constitutes a large risk if the members of the group have clearly identifiable underwriting characteristics; or

(2) an association that constitutes a large risk if the members of the association are engaged in similar undertakings.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 2171.003. POLICY FORM FILINGS. (a) An insurer shall file a policy form with the commissioner before using the form for a group of businesses or an association described by Section 2171.002 in which each member of the group or association is not a large risk.

(b) A filing made under this section is for informational purposes only.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 2171.004. RATE FILINGS. An insurer shall file with the commissioner in accordance with Chapter 2251 the following information for commercial group property insurance written under this chapter in this state:

(1) rates;

(2) supplementary rating information; and

(3) pertinent supporting information.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.

Sec. 2171.005. IDENTIFICATION OF INSURED REQUIRED. An insurer filing a policy form under Section 2171.003 or rates and related information under Section 2171.004 shall clearly identify the group of businesses or the association to be insured.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 727 (H.B. 2017), Sec. 2, eff. April 1, 2007.